Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.390

Transfer of county sheriff's employees—Rules.

In addition to its other duties prescribed by law, the civil service commission shall make rules necessary to provide for the orderly integration of employees of a county sheriff's office to the police department of the city, code city, or town pursuant to RCW 35.13.360 through 35.13.400.

[ 1993 c 189 s 5.]